morph_analyzers/TRmorph/analyzer.cpp.lexc
LEXICON TAMCondPAgr
%<1s%>:m@MB         TAMCondPAgrCont;
%<2s%>:n@MB         TAMCondPAgrCont;
%<3s%>:0@MB         TAMCondPAgrCont;
%<1p%>:k@MB         TAMCondPAgrCont;
%<2p%>:n^Iz@MB      TAMCondPAgrCont;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB      TAMCond3pCont;

LEXICON TAMCondPAgrCont
                        ENDLEX;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB      TAMCondQPAgrCont; ! this is somewhat odd: oku-sa-k mı

LEXICON TAMCond3pCont
                        TAMCondPAgrCont;
                        PAgrCplPast2;
                        PAgrCplEvid2;

LEXICON TAMCondQPAgrCont
                ENDLEX;
                PAgrCplPast2;
                PAgrCplEvid2;

LEXICON TAMCondYACont ! this is informal: gel-e-ydi
            CplPast2;
            CplEvid2;

!
! Optative
!

LEXICON TAMOptCont
                        OptPAgr;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB      OptQCont;

                        ENDLEX;


LEXICON OptQCont
%<cpl%:past%>:^(y)^D^NS^I@MB     PAgrG2End;
%<cpl%:evid%>:^(y)m^NS^Iş@MB     PAgrG1End;

! TODO: opt3s below seems to be a half-implemented feature, but not
!       clear what...

LEXICON OptPAgr
%<1s%>:^(y)^NS^Im@MB    OptPAgrCont;
%<2s%>:s^In@MB          ENDLEX;
%<3s%>:@opt3s^In@MB     OptPAgrCont;
%<1p%>:l^Im@MB          OptPAgrCont;
%<2p%>:s^NS^In^Iz@MB    ENDLEX;
%<3p%:sInlAr%>:@opt3s^Inl^Ar@MB OptPAgrCont;
%<3s%:%0%>:0@MB             OptPAgrCont; ! these two are 
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB          OptPAgrCont; ! colloquial use

LEXICON OptPAgrCont
                        ENDLEX;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB      OptPagrQCont;

LEXICON OptPagrQCont
                        ENDLEX;
                        PAgrCplEvid2;
                        PAgrCplPast2;

!
! Imperative
!

LEXICON TAMImpCont
                        PAgrIMPEnd;

LEXICON PAgrIMPEnd
%<2s%>:0@MB             ENDLEX;
%<2s%:sAnA%>:s^An^NS^A@MB     ENDLEX;
%<2s%:yIn%>:^(y)^In@MB       ENDLEX;
%<3s%>:s^NS^In@MB       ENDLEX;
%<2p%:yIn%>:^(y)^In@MB       ENDLEX;
%<2p%:yInIz%>:^(y)^NS^In^Iz@MB ENDLEX;
%<2p%:sAnIz%>:s^An^NS^Iz^A@MB  ENDLEX;
%<3p%>:s^Inl^Ar@MB      ENDLEX;

!
! Person agreement markers, final state.
!
LEXICON PAgrG1End
%<1s%>:^(y)^Im@MB  ENDLEX;
%<2s%>:s^In@MB     ENDLEX;
%<3s%>:0@MB        ENDLEX;
%<1p%>:^(y)^Iz@MB  ENDLEX;
%<2p%>:s^In^Iz@MB  ENDLEX;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB     ENDLEX;

LEXICON PAgrG2End
%<1s%>:m@MB         ENDLEX;
%<2s%>:n@MB         ENDLEX;
%<3s%>:0@MB         ENDLEX;
%<1p%>:k@MB         ENDLEX;
%<2p%>:n^Iz@MB      ENDLEX;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB      ENDLEX;


!
! i- is a bound (verbal) root that combines with copular markers.
!

LEXICON V_i
%<V%>:@RB         iCont;

LEXICON iCont
            CplAll;


!
! -mI is the question particle. In its main use, we mark it as <Q>.
! For other uses we also analyze it as an adverb (when used for 
! emphasizing: 'güzel mi güzel bir kız') or subordinating conjunction
! for the cases where it is used as such (Eve vardınız mı bana
! telefon edin')
!

LEXICON mI
%<Q%>:@RB             mICont;
%<Cnj%:sub%>:@RB      ENDLEX;
%<Adv%>:@RB           ENDLEX;

LEXICON mICont
                        ENDLEX; ! we have person marker before.   
%<cpl%:pres%>:0         mIPagr; ! in case predicate is not marked for tense
                        mIPagr;
                        mIDI;
                        mIMIS;
                        mIDIr;

LEXICON mIPagr
%<1s%>:^(y)^Im@MB      mIPagrCont;
%<2s%>:s^In@MB         mIPagrCont;
%<3s%>:0@MB            mIPagrCont;
%<1p%>:^(y)^Iz@MB      mIPagrCont;
%<2p%>:s^In^Iz@MB      mIPagrCont;

LEXICON  mIPagrCont
                        ENDLEX;
                        DIrEnd;
LEXICON mIDI
%<cpl%:past%>:^(y)^D^NS^I@MB  PAgrG2End;

LEXICON mIMIS
%<cpl%:evid%>:^(y)m^NS^Iş@MB PAgrG1End;

LEXICON mIDIr
%<dir%>:^D^NS^Ir@MB        mIDIrCont;

LEXICON  mIDIrCont
                        ENDLEX;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB          ENDLEX;

! Copular marker combinations
!
! this is for simplifying the copula replication above.
!
! the description below may be a bit too permissive

! here we do not have any agreement markers yet
!
LEXICON CplAll
    CplEvid;
    CplPast;
    CplCond;
    CplKen;
    lArCplKen; ! this is a trick to analyze words like 'yürürlerken'
               ! or 'evdelerken'. It seems if person in question is
               ! <3p>, then it can be added, but other cases take null
               ! agreement. We only mark <3p>, if there is -lAr.
               ! Otherwise it can agree with any person, but we do not 
               ! mark it.
               !
               ! TODO: this may not be the best decision.

LEXICON CplEvid
%<cpl%:evid%>:^(y)m^NS^Iş@MB     CplEvidCont;

LEXICON CplEvidCont
                PAgrG1End;
                CplPAgrG1; ! this is marked/rare usage - gidiyormuşumsa
                CplCond2;
                CplEvid2;
                CplPast2;
                CVcesinePagr;
! TODO: In a relatively rare number of cases -DIr may follow if -(I)yor 
!       precedes the evidential copula.

LEXICON CplEvid2
%<cpl%:evid%>:^(y)m^NS^Iş@MB     PAgrG1End;
    
LEXICON CplPast2
%<cpl%:past%>:^(y)^D^NS^I@MB      PAgrG2End;

LEXICON CplCond2
%<cpl%:cond%>:^(y)s^NS^A@MB       PAgrG2End;

LEXICON CplCond
%<cpl%:cond%>:^(y)s^NS^A@MB       CplCondCont;

LEXICON  CplCondCont
                            PAgrG2End;
                            CplEvid2;
                            CplPast2;

LEXICON  CplPast
%<cpl%:past%>:^(y)^D^NS^I@MB      CplPastCont;

LEXICON CplPastCont
                PAgrG2End;
                CplCond2;
                CplPAgrG2; ! this is marked/rare usage - gidiyordumsa
                CplPast2; ! this is also borderline case: 'yapacaktıydı'

LEXICON CplPAgrG1
%<1s%>:^(y)^Im@MB  CplPAgrG1Cont;
%<2s%>:s^In@MB     CplPAgrG1Cont;
%<3s%>:0@MB        CplPAgrG1Cont;
%<1p%>:^(y)^Iz@MB  CplPAgrG1Cont;
%<2p%>:s^In^Iz@MB  CplPAgrG1Cont;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB     CplPAgrG1Cont;

LEXICON CplPAgrG1Cont
                        ENDLEX;
                        PAgrCplCond2;


LEXICON CplPAgrG2
%<1s%>:m@MB         CplPAgrG2Cont;
%<2s%>:n@MB         CplPAgrG2Cont;
%<3s%>:0@MB         CplPAgrG2Cont;
%<1p%>:k@MB         CplPAgrG2Cont;
%<2p%>:n^Iz@MB      CplPAgrG2Cont;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB      CplPAgrG2Cont;

LEXICON CplPAgrG2Cont
                        ENDLEX;
                        PAgrCplCond2;

! here if we have a person agreement already, happens after -DI, -sA
! and with -lAr after other TAM markers or nouns.
! 

LEXICON PAgrCplAll
                PAgrCplEvid;
                PAgrCplPast;
                PAgrCplCond;

LEXICON PAgrCplEvid
%<cpl%:evid%>:^(y)m^NS^Iş@MB     PAgrCplEvidCont;

LEXICON PAgrCplEvidCont
                            ENDLEX;
                            PAgrCplCond2;

LEXICON PAgrCplPast
%<cpl%:past%>:^(y)^D^NS^I@MB      PAgrCplPastCont;

LEXICON PAgrCplPastCont
                            PAgrCplCond2;
                            ENDLEX;

LEXICON PAgrCplCond
%<cpl%:cond%>:^(y)s^NS^A@MB       PAgrCplCondCont;

LEXICON PAgrCplCondCont
                            ENDLEX;
                             PAgrCplEvid2;
                             PAgrCplPast2;

LEXICON PAgrCplEvid2
%<cpl%:evid%>:^(y)m^NS^Iş@MB     ENDLEX;

LEXICON PAgrCplPast2
%<cpl%:past%>:^(y)^D^NS^I@MB      ENDLEX;

LEXICON PAgrCplCond2
%<cpl%:cond%>:^(y)s^NS^A@MB       ENDLEX;


!
! -(y)ken makes adverbials (converb?). However it  attaches where copular 
! markers typically attach, except it does not combine with person 
! agreement markers.
!

LEXICON lArCplKen
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB      CplKen;

LEXICON CplKen
%<cv%:ken%>%<Adv%>:^(y)k^NSen@MB  AdvTimeCont; 

!
! Subordinating suffixes
!
!

LEXICON SubSuffixes
VerbalNoun;
Participle;
ConVerb;

LEXICON VerbalNoun
%<vn%:infmA%>%<N%>:m^A@MB            VNMaCont;
%<vn%:infmAK%>%<N%>:m^A^K@MB         VNMakCont;
%<vn%:past%>%<N%>:^D^I^k@MB          Ncont;
%<vn%:fut%>%<N%>:^(y)^Ac^A^k@MB      Ncont;
%<vn%:pres%>%<N%>:^(y)^An@MB         Ncont;
%<vn%:yis%>%<N%>:^(y)^Iş@MB          Ncont;     !TODO: a better tag name
%<vn%:esi%>%<N%>:^(y)^As^I@MB        Ncont;     !TODO: a better tag name

LEXICON Root
mı        mI;
mi        mI;
mu        mI;
mü        mI;
i         V_i;
